California statutes. Elections Code
 0100.17, 0100.18, 0100.19, 0101.03, 0101.04, 0101.06, 0101.07, 0101.09, 0101.10, 0101.11, 0101.12, 0102.02, 0103.00, 0104.01, 0104.02, 0105.02, 0116.01, 0116.02, 0117.00, 0118.01, 0118.02, 0119.02, 0120.02, 0120.03, 0121.01, 0121.02, 0122.00, 0123.02, 0123.03, 0123.04, 0124.01, 0124.02, 0125.01, 0125.02, 0126.00, 0127.00, 0128.00, 0129.00, 0130.00, 0131.02, 0131.03, 0131.04, 0132.03, 0132.04, 0132.05, 0132.06, 0133.01, 0133.02, 0133.03, 0133.06, 0133.07, 0133.08, 0133.09, 0133.12, 0133.15, 0133.16, 0133.17, 0133.18, 0133.19, 0133.20, 0133.21, 0133.22, 0133.23, 0133.24, 0133.25, 0133.26, 0133.27, 0134.01, 0134.09, 0134.11, 0134.12, 0134.14, 0134.15, 0134.16, 0134.17, 0134.18, 0134.20, 0134.21, 0134.22, 0134.23, 0134.24, 0134.25, 0139.03, 0139.05, 0139.06, 0139.07, 0139.08, 0139.09, 0211.01, 0213.02, 0213.04, 0213.06, 0219.00, 0220.00

Partial Tracts in San Diego County

0016.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010

0030.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4001, 4002, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4014, 4015

0031.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1022, 2001, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008

0032.08--the following census blocks:

5006, 5007, 5008

0032.09--the following census blocks:

2007, 2008

0032.13--the following census blocks:

1008

0032.14--the following census blocks:

1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006

0041.01--the following census blocks:

3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022

0041.02--the following census blocks:

1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021

0042.00--the following census blocks:

1009, 1011

0046.00--the
 following census blocks:

2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014

0047.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019

0051.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020

0052.01--the following census blocks:

1022

0102.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010,
 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018

0105.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1019

0106.01--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2031, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037

0110.00--the following census blocks:

1000

0140.02--the following census blocks:

1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021

0142.00--the following census blocks:

3016, 3017

0155.02--the following census blocks:

1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029

0211.02--the following census blocks:

1033, 1072, 1073, 1083, 1084, 1091, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159,
 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1170, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045

0212.02--the following census blocks:

2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037

0212.04--the following census blocks:

1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2027,
 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032

0212.05--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004

0213.05--the following census blocks:

1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1017, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1030, 1031, 1032, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21453.

In the event that a census tract or census block is not listed, is listed more than once, or is only partially accounted for, and, as a result, an ambiguity or dispute arises regarding the location of a boundary line, the Secretary of State and the elections official of each county shall rely on the detailed maps prepared by the Assembly Committee on Elections and the Senate Committee on Elections and Constitutional Amendments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21454.

This chapter shall become operative only if Assembly Constitutional Amendment 8 of the 2025–26 Regular Session is approved by the voters and takes effect, and subdivision (b) of Section 4 of Article XXI of the California Constitution, as added by that constitutional amendment, becomes operative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21455.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until a new map of congressional districts is certified by the Citizens Redistricting Commission pursuant to Section 2 of Article XXI of the California Constitution and, as of that date, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 5, commencing with Section 21400.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Supervisorial Districts [21500. - 21506.]

21500.

Following a county’s decision to elect its board using district-based elections, or following each federal decennial census for a county whose board is already elected using district-based elections, the board shall, by ordinance or resolution, adopt boundaries for all of the supervisorial districts of the county pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 21100).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 15.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

21500.1.

This chapter applies to a county that elects members of the county’s board of supervisors by districts or from districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 16.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

21503.

(a) After redistricting or districting, a board shall not adopt new supervisorial district boundaries until after the next federal decennial census, except under the following circumstances:

(1) A court orders the board to redistrict.

(2) The board is settling a legal claim that its supervisorial district boundaries violate the United States Constitution, the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10301 et seq.), or this chapter.

(3) The boundaries of the county change by the addition or subtraction of territory.

(4) The number of supervisors elected by districts or from districts is increased or decreased.

(5) An independent redistricting commission is established pursuant to Section 23003 to adopt new supervisorial districts between federal decennial censuses and the districts being replaced were adopted by the board of supervisors.

(b) This section does not prohibit a board from adopting supervisorial districts between federal decennial censuses if the board is adopting supervisorial districts for the first time, including when a board adopts supervisorial districts for the purpose of transitioning from electing its supervisors in at-large elections to elections by districts or from districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 18.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

21506.

(a) The term of office of any supervisor who has been elected and whose term of office has not expired shall not be affected by any change in the boundaries of the district from which the supervisor was elected and that supervisor shall continue to represent the constituents residing in the district boundaries from which the supervisor was elected for the duration of that term of office. This section does not prevent a board from assigning a county elected official or county official to provide constituent services for residents of an area that is temporarily not represented by a supervisor due to redistricting.

(b) At the first election for county supervisors in each county following
 adoption of the boundaries of supervisorial districts, excluding a special election to fill a vacancy or a recall election, a supervisor shall be elected for each district under the new district plan that has the same district number as a district whose incumbent’s term is due to expire. This subdivision does not apply when a county transitions from at-large to district-based elections.

(c) For a county employing both a primary and a general election, a change in the boundaries of a supervisorial district shall not be made between the direct primary election and the general election.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (a), a person is not eligible to hold office as a member of a board of supervisors unless that person meets the requirements of Section 201 of the Elections Code and
 Section 24001 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 19.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.2. County of San Luis Obispo Citizens Redistricting Commission [21520. - 21527.]

21520.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Board” means the Board of Supervisors of the County of San Luis Obispo.

(b) “Commission” means the Citizens Redistricting Commission in the County of San Luis Obispo established pursuant to Section 21521.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 450, Sec. 1.   (SB 977)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21521.

There is, in the County of San Luis Obispo, a Citizens Redistricting Commission. In the year following the year in which the decennial federal census is taken, the commission shall adjust the boundary lines of the supervisorial districts of the board in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 450, Sec. 1.   (SB 977)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21522.

(a) The commission shall be created no later than December 31, 2030, and in each year ending in the number zero thereafter.

(b) The selection process is designed to produce a commission that is independent from the influence of the board and reasonably representative of the county’s diversity.

(c) The commission shall consist of 11 members. The political party preferences of the commission members, as shown on the members’ most recent affidavits of registration, shall be as proportional as possible to the total number of voters who are registered with
 each political party in the County of San Luis Obispo, or who decline to state or do not indicate a party preference, as determined by registration at the most recent statewide election. However, the political party or no party preferences of the commission members are not required to be exactly the same as the proportion of political party and no party preferences among the registered voters of the county. At least one commission member shall reside in each of the five existing supervisorial districts of the board.

(d) Each commission member shall meet all of the following qualifications:

(1) Be a resident of the County of San Luis Obispo.

(2) Be a voter who has been continuously registered in
 the County of San Luis Obispo with the same political party or no party preference and who has not changed their political party or no party preference for five or more years immediately preceding the date of their appointment to the commission.

(3) Have voted in at least one of the last three statewide elections immediately preceding their application to be a member of the commission.

(4) Be subject to and meet the conditions set forth in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 23003.

(5) Possess experience that demonstrates analytical skills relevant to the redistricting process and voting rights, and possess an ability to comprehend and apply the applicable state and federal legal
 requirements.

(6) Possess experience that demonstrates an ability to be impartial.

(7) Possess experience that demonstrates an appreciation for the diverse demographics and geography of the County of San Luis Obispo.

(e) An interested person meeting the qualifications specified in subdivision (d) may submit an application to the county elections official to be considered for membership on the commission. The county elections official shall review the applications and eliminate applicants who do not meet the specified qualifications.

(f) (1) From the pool of qualified applicants, the county elections
 official shall select up to 60 qualified applicants, taking into account the requirements described in subdivision (c). The county elections official shall make public the names of up to 60 qualified applicants for at least 30 days. The county elections official shall not communicate with a member of the board, or an agent for a member of the board, about any matter related to the nomination process or applicants before the publication of the list of the up to 60 qualified applicants.

(2) During the period described in paragraph (1), the county elections official may eliminate any of the previously selected applicants if the county elections official becomes aware that the applicant does not meet the qualifications specified in subdivision (d).

(g) (1) After complying with the requirements of subdivision (f), the county elections official shall create a subpool for each of the five existing supervisorial districts of the board.

(2) At a regularly scheduled meeting of the board, the clerk of the board or designee of the County of San Luis Obispo shall conduct a random drawing to select one commissioner from each of the five subpools established by the county elections official.

(h) (1) The five commissioners selected under subdivision (g), at a separate public meeting, shall review the remaining names of applicants, interview the finalists for appointment, allow public comment, and appoint six additional members to the commission, without respect to the subpools.

(2) In order to be appointed, an applicant must receive the vote of at least three of the five selected commissioners.

(3) The six additional commissioners shall be chosen based on relevant experience, analytical skills, and ability to be impartial, and to ensure that the commission reflects the county’s diversity, including racial, ethnic, geographic, and gender diversity. However, formulas or specific ratios shall not be applied for this purpose. The five selected commissioners shall also consider political party preference, selecting applicants so that the political party preference of the members of the commission complies with subdivision (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 450, Sec. 1.   (SB 977)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21523.

(a) A commission member shall apply this chapter in a manner that is impartial and that reinforces public confidence in the integrity of the redistricting process. 

(b) The term of office of each member of the commission expires upon the appointment of the first member of the succeeding commission. 

(c) Seven members of the commission shall constitute a quorum. Seven or more affirmative votes shall be required for any official action. 

(d) To the greatest extent practicable, each commission member shall be present for all public hearings and internal meetings of the commission.

(e) (1) The commission shall require a consultant, before delivering advice to the commission or a commission member, to disclose to the commission potential or actual conflicts of interest.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, “consultant” means a person, whether or not compensated, retained to advise the commission or a commission member regarding the redistricting process.

(f) (1) Except as permitted by paragraph (2), commissioners shall not communicate with any individual or organization regarding redistricting matters outside of a public meeting.

(2) This subdivision does not do either of the following:

(A) Restrict the commission from communicating with the staff of the legislative body of the local jurisdiction regarding administrative matters of the commission.

(B) Restrict a commissioner from directly communicating with another commissioner, commission staff, legal counsel, or consultants retained by the commission.

(g) (1) The commission shall create bylaws or other rules of procedure for the purpose of conducting
 orderly meetings and communication. 

(2) The bylaws shall include provisions to address
 both of the following:

(A) How the commission will fill a vacancy following the resignation or removal of a commission member.

(B) The process for the commission to remove a commission member that is consistent with Section 21526.

(h) Each commission member shall be a designated employee for purposes of the conflict of interest code adopted by the County of San Luis Obispo pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 87300) of Chapter 7 of Title 9 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 450, Sec. 1.   (SB 977)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21524.

(a) The commission shall establish single-member supervisorial districts for the board pursuant to a mapping process using the following criteria as set forth in the following order of priority:

(1) (A) Districts shall comply with the United States Constitution and each district shall have a reasonably equal population with other districts for the board, except where deviation is required to comply with the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.) or allowable by law.

(B) Population equality shall be based on
 the total population of residents of the county as determined by the most recent federal decennial census for which the redistricting data described in Public Law 94-171 are available.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B), an incarcerated person, as that term is used in Section 21003, shall not be counted towards the county’s population, except for an incarcerated person whose last known place of residence may be assigned to a census block in the county, if information about the last known place of residence for incarcerated persons is included in the computerized database for redistricting that is developed in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 8253 of the Government Code, and that database is made publicly available.

(2) Districts shall comply with the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).

(3) The commission shall adopt election district boundaries using the criteria set forth in Section 21130.

(b) The commission shall comply with the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(c) Before the commission draws a map, the commission shall conduct at least five public hearings, to take place over a period of no fewer than 30 days, with at least one public hearing held in each supervisorial district. 

(d) In the event any state or local health order prohibits large gatherings, the commission may modify the location of the hearings, including through the use of virtual hearings that use technology to permit remote viewing and participation, to the extent required to comply with public health requirements. If the commission modifies the location of a hearing, it shall provide opportunities to view and listen to proceedings by video, to listen to proceedings by phone, and to provide public comment by phone and in writing with no limitation on the number of commenters. The commission shall, to the greatest extent practicable, provide an opportunity for in-person participation for at least one hearing in each supervisorial district. Methods for providing in-person participation may include setting up multiple rooms with audiovisual connections to the hearing, allowing community members to
 make appointments to make public comment, providing personal protective equipment, or holding hearings in outdoor spaces. 

(e) After the commission draws a draft map, the commission shall do both of the following: 

(1) Post the map for public comment on the website of the County of San Luis Obispo. 

(2) Conduct at least three public hearings to take place over a period of no fewer than 30 days. 

(f) The commission shall establish and make available to the public a calendar of all public hearings described in subdivisions (c) and (e). Hearings shall be
 scheduled at various times and days of the week to accommodate a variety of work schedules and to reach as large an audience as possible. 

(g) Notwithstanding Section 54954.2 of the Government Code, the commission shall post the agenda for the public hearings described in subdivisions (c) and (e) at least seven days before the
 hearings. The agenda for a meeting required by subdivision (e) shall include a copy of the draft map. 

(h) (1) The commission shall arrange for the live translation of a hearing held pursuant to this chapter in an applicable language if a request for translation is made at least 72 hours before the hearing. 

(2) For purposes of this section, an “applicable language” means a language for which the number of residents of the County of San Luis Obispo who are members of a language minority is greater than or equal to 3 percent of the total voting age residents of the county. 

(i) The commission shall take
 steps to encourage county residents to participate in the redistricting public review process. These steps may include: 

(1) Providing information through media, social media, and public service announcements. 

(2) Coordinating with community organizations. 

(3) Posting information on the website of the County of San Luis Obispo that explains the redistricting process and includes a notice of each public hearing and the procedures for testifying during a hearing or submitting written testimony directly to the commission. 

(j) The commission shall ensure
 that all outreach materials, public notifications, agendas, and content on its website, including instructions for testifying and submitting written public testimony, are translated in all applicable languages.

(k) The board shall take all steps necessary to ensure that a complete and accurate computerized database is available for redistricting, and that procedures are in place to provide to the public ready access to redistricting data and computer software equivalent to what is available to the commission members. 

(l) The board shall provide for reasonable funding and staffing for
 the commission. 

(m) All records of the commission relating to redistricting, and all data considered by the commission in drawing a draft map or the final map, are public records. 

(n) (1) The commission shall adopt a redistricting plan adjusting the boundaries of the supervisorial districts and shall file the plan with the county elections official by the map adoption deadline set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 21140. The commission shall not release a draft map before the date set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 21160. 

(2) The plan shall be subject to referendum in the same manner as ordinances. 

(3) The commission shall issue, with the final map, a report that explains the basis on which the commission made its decisions in achieving compliance with the criteria described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 450, Sec. 1.   (SB 977)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21525.

A commission member shall not do any of the following:

(a) While serving on the commission, endorse, work for, volunteer for, or make a campaign contribution to a candidate for an elective office of the County of San Luis Obispo.

(b) Be a candidate for an elective office of the County of San Luis Obispo if either of the following is true:

(1) Less than five years has elapsed since the date of the member’s
 appointment to the commission.

(2) The election for that office will be conducted using district boundaries that were adopted by the commission on which the member served, and those district boundaries have not been subsequently readopted by a commission after the end of the member’s term on the commission.

(c) For four years commencing with the date of the person’s appointment to the commission:

(1) Accept employment as a staff member of, or consultant to, an elected official or candidate for elective office of the County of San Luis Obispo.

(2) Receive a noncompetitively bid contract with the County of San Luis Obispo.

(3) Register as a lobbyist for the County of San Luis Obispo.

(d) For two years commencing with the date of the person’s appointment to the commission, accept an appointment to an office of the County of San Luis Obispo.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 450, Sec. 1.   (SB 977)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21526.

(a) The commission may only remove a commission member for substantial neglect of duty, gross misconduct in office, causing the commission to be unable to discharge its duties with seven affirmative votes, or if it is later discovered that the commission member did not meet the required qualifications, as set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 21522, at the time of appointment or if the commission member no longer meets those required qualifications while serving on the commission.

(1) A commission member who is subject to removal shall not vote on their own removal.

(b) Prior to removal pursuant to subdivision (a), a commission member is entitled to receive all of the following from the commission:

(1) The reasons for their proposed removal, in writing.

(2) At least one week’s written notice of the public meeting where the commission will vote on their proposed removal.

(3) The opportunity to respond to or rebut the reasons for their removal in writing and at the public meeting described in paragraph (2).

(c) The
 commission may employ legal counsel in seeking removal of a commission member pursuant to this section.

(d) The decision of the commission to remove a member pursuant to this section is final, nonappealable, and is not subject to judicial review.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 450, Sec. 1.   (SB 977)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21527.

If the commission is unable to act because it has fewer than seven voting commission members, within one month of such determination that the commission cannot act, the county elections official shall select a replacement from the pool of remaining qualified candidates from the initial commission member selection process. To the greatest extent practicable, the newly selected commission member shall have the same political party preference as the commission member who vacated their position.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 450, Sec. 1.   (SB 977)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.3. County of Los Angeles Citizens Redistricting Commission [21530. - 21535.]

21530.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Board” means the Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles.

(b) “Commission” means the Citizens Redistricting Commission in the County of Los Angeles established pursuant to Section 21532.

(c) “Immediate family member” means a spouse, child, in-law, parent, or sibling.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.   (SB 958)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

21531.

There is, in the County of Los Angeles, a Citizens Redistricting Commission. In the year following the year in which the decennial federal census is taken, the commission shall adjust the boundary lines of the supervisorial districts of the board in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.   (SB 958)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

21532.

(a) The commission shall be created no later than December 31, 2020, and in each year ending in the number zero thereafter.

(b) The selection process is designed to produce a commission that is independent from the influence of the board and reasonably representative of the county’s diversity.

(c) The commission shall consist of 14 members. The political party preferences of the commission members, as shown on the members’ most recent affidavits of registration, shall be as proportional as possible to the total number of voters who are registered with each political party in the County of Los
 Angeles or who decline to state or do not indicate a party preference, as determined by registration at the most recent statewide election. However, the political party or no party preferences of the commission members are not required to be exactly the same as the proportion of political party and no party preferences among the registered voters of the county. At least one commission member shall reside in each of the five existing supervisorial districts of the board.

(d) Each commission member shall meet all of the following qualifications:

(1) Be a resident of the County of Los Angeles.

(2) Be a voter who has been continuously registered in the County of Los Angeles with the same political party or
 no party preference and who has not changed their political party or no party preference for five or more years immediately preceding the date of their appointment to the commission.

(3) Have voted in at least one of the last three statewide elections immediately preceding their application to be a member of the commission.

(4) Within the 10 years immediately preceding the date of application to the commission, neither the applicant, nor an immediate family member of the applicant, has done any of the following:

(A) Been appointed to, elected to, or have been a candidate for office at the local, state, or federal level representing the County of Los Angeles, including as a member of the
 board.

(B) Served as an employee of, or paid consultant for, an elected representative at the local, state, or federal level representing the County of Los Angeles.

(C) Served as an employee of, or paid consultant for, a candidate for office at the local, state, or federal level representing the County of Los Angeles.

(D) Served as an officer, employee, or paid consultant of a political party or as an appointed member of a political party central committee.

(E) Been a registered state or local lobbyist.

(5) Possess experience that demonstrates analytical skills relevant to the redistricting process
 and voting rights, and possess an ability to comprehend and apply the applicable state and federal
 legal requirements.

(6) Possess experience that demonstrates an ability to be impartial.

(7) Possess experience that demonstrates an appreciation for the diverse demographics and geography of the County of Los Angeles.

(e) An interested person meeting the qualifications specified in subdivision (d) may submit an application to the county elections official to be considered for membership on the commission. The county elections official shall review the applications and eliminate applicants who do not meet the specified qualifications.

(f) (1) From the pool of qualified applicants, the county elections official shall
 select 60 of the most qualified applicants, taking into account the requirements described in subdivision (c). The county elections official shall make public the names of the 60 most qualified applicants for at least 30 days. The county elections official shall not communicate with a member of the board, or an agent for a member of the board, about any matter related to the nomination process or applicants before the publication of the list of the 60 most qualified applicants.

(2) During the period described in paragraph (1), the county elections official may eliminate any of the previously selected applicants if the official becomes aware that the applicant does not meet the qualifications specified in subdivision (d).

(g) (1) After complying with the
 requirements of subdivision (f), the county elections official shall create a subpool for each of the five existing supervisorial districts of the board.

(2) (A) At a regularly scheduled meeting of the board, the Auditor-Controller of the County of Los Angeles shall conduct a random drawing to select one commissioner from each of the five subpools established by the county elections official.

(B) After completing the random drawing pursuant to subparagraph (A), at the same meeting of the board, the Auditor-Controller shall conduct a random drawing from all of the remaining applicants, without respect to subpools, to select three additional commissioners.

(h) (1) The eight selected
 commissioners shall review the remaining names in the subpools of applicants and shall appoint six additional applicants to the commission.

(2) The six appointees shall be chosen based on relevant experience, analytical skills, and ability to be impartial, and to ensure that the commission reflects the county’s diversity, including racial, ethnic, geographic, and gender diversity. However, formulas or specific ratios shall not be applied for this purpose. The eight commissioners shall also consider political party preference, selecting applicants so that the political party preference of the members of the commission complies with subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 107, Sec. 1.   (SB 158)   Effective September 18, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

21533.

(a) A commission member shall apply this chapter in a manner that is impartial and that reinforces public confidence in the integrity of the redistricting process.

(b) The term of office of each member of the commission expires upon the appointment of the first member of the succeeding commission.

(c) Nine members of the commission shall constitute a quorum. Nine or more affirmative votes shall be required for any official action.

(d) (1) The commission shall not retain a consultant who would not be qualified as an applicant pursuant to paragraph (4) of
 subdivision (d) of Section 21532.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “consultant” means a person, whether or not compensated, retained to advise the commission or a commission member regarding any aspect of the redistricting process.

(e) Each commission member shall be a designated employee for purposes of the conflict of interest code adopted by the County of Los Angeles pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 87300) of Chapter 7 of Title 9 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.   (SB 958)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

21534.

(a) The commission shall establish single-member supervisorial districts for the board pursuant to a mapping process using the following criteria as set forth in the following order of priority:

(1) (A) Districts shall comply with the United States Constitution and each district shall have a reasonably equal population with other districts for the board, except where deviation is required to comply with the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.) or allowable by law.

(B) Population equality shall be based on the total population of residents of the county as determined by the
 most recent federal decennial census for which the redistricting data described in Public Law 94-171 are available.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B), an incarcerated person, as that term is used in Section 21003, shall not be counted towards the county’s population, except for an incarcerated person whose last known place of residence may be assigned to a census block in the county, if information about the last known place of residence for incarcerated persons is included in the computerized database for redistricting that is developed in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 8253 of the Government Code, and that database is made publicly available.

(2) Districts shall comply with the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).

(3) Districts shall be geographically contiguous.

(4) The geographic integrity of any city, local neighborhood, or local community of interest shall be respected in a manner that minimizes its division to the extent possible without violating the requirements of paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive. A community of interest is a contiguous population that shares common social and economic interests that should be included within a single district for purposes of its effective and fair representation. Communities of interest shall not include relationships with political parties, incumbents, or political candidates.

(5) To the extent practicable, and where this does not conflict with paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, districts shall
 be drawn to encourage geographical compactness such that nearby areas of population are not bypassed for more distant areas of population.

(b) The place of residence of any incumbent or political candidate shall not be considered in the creation of a map. Districts shall not be drawn for purposes of favoring or discriminating against an incumbent, political candidate, or political party.

(c) (1) The commission shall comply with the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(2) (A) Before the commission draws a map, the commission shall conduct at least seven public hearings, to take place over a period
 of no fewer than 30 days, with at least one public hearing held in each supervisorial district.
